el: Μορφή ζύμης: Μπάλα; Μπλοκ; Δίσκος; Ρολό ζύμης; Φύλλο; Τριμμένες λωρίδες; Τετράγωνο φύλλο; Άλλο
ro-RO: Formatul aluatului: Bilă; Bloc; Disc; Rulou de aluat; Foaie; Fire fărâmițate; Foaie pătrată; Altele
pt-BR: Formato da massa: Bola; Bloco; Disco; Cilindro de massa; Folha; Fios desfiados; Folha quadrada; Outros
vi: Trạng thái khối bột nhào: Viên tròn; Khối; Khối tròn dẹt; Khối trụ; Dạng lá; Sợi vụn; Dạng lá vuông; Khác
de: Teigformat: Kugel; Block; Scheibe; Teigrolle; Teigplatte; Teigstränge; Quadratische Teigplatte; Sonstige
zh-CN: 面团形态: 球形; 块状; 圆盘形; 面团卷; 片状; 碎条状; 方形片状; 其他
sl-SI: Oblika testa: Krogla; Blok; Disk; Svaljek testa; Plošča; Narezani prameni; Kvadratna plošča; Drugo
ko: 반죽 형태: 볼; 블록; 디스크; 도우 로그; 시트; 잘게 썬 가닥; 사각 시트; 기타
tr: Hamur formu: Top; Blok; Disk; Rulo hamur; Tabaka; Kıyılmış şeritler; Kare tabaka; Diğer
bg-BG: Формат на тестото: Топка; Блок; Диск; Руло; Лист; Нарязани нишки; Квадратен лист; Друго
nb: Deigformat: Kule; Blokk; Skive; Deigrull; Plate; Strimler; Firkantet plate; Annet
da: Dejformat: Kugle; Blok; Skive; Dejrulle; Plade; Revede strimler; Firkantet plade; Andet
en: Dough format: Ball; Block; Disc; Dough log; Sheet; Shredded strands; Square sheet; Other
hr-HR: Oblik tijesta: Kugla; Blok; Disk; Valjak od tijesta; List; Usitnjene niti; Kvadratni list; Ostalo
sk-SK: Formát cesta: Guľa; Blok; Kotúč; Valec z cesta; Plát; Nastrúhané pramene; Štvorcový plát; Iný
nl: Deegformaat: Bal; Blok; Schijf; Deegrol; Vel; Geraspte slierten; Vierkant vel; Overige
fi: Taikinan muoto: Pallo; Lohko; Kiekko; Taikinapötkö; Levy; Raastetut säikeet; Neliönmuotoinen levy; Muu
ru: Формат теста: Шар; Блок; Диск; Полено; Пласт; Нарезанные полоски/нити; Квадратный пласт; Другое
it: Formato dell'impasto: Palla; Panetto; Disco; Filone; Sfoglia; Fili spezzettati; Sfoglia quadrata; Altro
ja: 生地フォーマット: ボール; ブロック; ディスク; 棒状; シート; 細切り; 四角いシート; その他
lt-LT: Tešlos formatas: Kamuolys; Blokas; Diskas; Tešlos ritinys; Lakštas; Susmulkintos gijos; Kvadratinis lakštas; Kita
cs: Formát těsta: Koule; Blok; Disk; Válec těsta; Plát; Nastrouhané prameny; Čtvercový plát; Jiné
zh-TW: 麵團形式: 球狀; 塊狀; 圓盤狀; 麵糰條; 片狀; 碎絲狀; 方片狀; 其他
th: รูปแบบแป้ง: ก้อนกลม; บล็อก; แผ่นกลม; ท่อนแป้ง; แผ่น; เส้นฝอย; แผ่นสี่เหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Formato da massa: Bola; Bloco; Disco; Cilindro de massa; Folha; Fios desfiados; Folha quadrada; Outro
pl: Format ciasta: Kula; Blok; Tarcza; Wałek ciasta; Arkusz; Rozdrobnione paski; Kwadratowy arkusz; Inne
fr: Type de pâte: Boule; Bloc; Disque; Rouleau de pâte; Feuille; Brins déchiquetés; Feuille carrée; Autre
sv: Degtyp: Boll; Block; Skiva; Degrulle; Ark; Strimlade trådar; Fyrkantigt ark; Övrigt
hu: Tészta formátuma: Golyó; Tömb; Korong; Tésztarúd; Lap; Reszelt szálak; Négyzetes lap; Egyéb
es: Formato de masa: Bola; Bloque; Disco; Rollo de masa; Lámina; Tiras desmenuzadas; Lámina cuadrada; Otro